Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-8910
Company; submit data.

A company shall submit mortality,
morbidity, policyholder behavior, or expense experience and other data as
prescribed in the valuation manual.

Laws 2014, LB755, § 10.